Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4803.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12a. The requirements of this act for obtaining a license to carry a concealed pistol do not apply to any of the following: (a) A peace officer of a duly authorized police agency of the United States or of this state or a political subdivision of this state, who is regularly employed and paid by the United States or this state or a subdivision of this state, except a township constable. (b) A constable who is trained and licensed or certified under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615, while engaged in his or her the individual's official duties or going to or coming from his or her the individual's official duties, and who is regularly employed and paid by a political subdivision of this state. (c) An individual regularly employed by the department of corrections and authorized in writing by the director of the department of corrections to carry a concealed pistol during the performance of his or her the individual's duties or while going to or returning from his or her the individual's duties. (d) An individual regularly employed as a local corrections officer by a county sheriff, who is trained in the use of force and is authorized in writing by the county sheriff to carry a concealed pistol during the performance of his or her the individual's duties. (e) An individual regularly employed in a city jail or lockup who has custody of individuals detained or incarcerated in the jail or lockup, is trained in the use of force, and is authorized in writing by the chief of police or the county sheriff to carry a concealed pistol during the performance of his or her the individual's duties. (f) A member of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, or Marine Corps while carrying a concealed pistol in the line of duty. (g) A member of the National Guard, armed forces reserves, or other duly authorized military organization while on duty or drill or while going to or returning from his or her the individual's place of assembly or practice or while carrying a concealed pistol for purposes of that military organization. (h) A resident of another state who is licensed by that state to carry a concealed pistol. (i) The regular and ordinary transportation of a pistol as merchandise by an authorized agent of a person licensed to manufacture firearms. (j) An individual while carrying a pistol unloaded in a wrapper or container in the trunk of his or her the individual's vehicle or, if the vehicle does not have a trunk, from transporting that pistol unloaded in a locked compartment or container that is separated from the ammunition for that pistol from the place of purchase to his or her the individual's home or place of business or to a place of repair or back to his or her the individual's home or place of business, or in moving goods from 1 place of abode or business to another place of abode or business. (k) A peace officer or law enforcement officer from Canada. (l) A member of the National Guard military police or security forces who is in title 32 status.